Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 4. Records.

Collateral references. —

39 Am. Jur. 2d, Health, § 108.

66 Am. Jur. 2d, Records and Recording Laws, §§ 1 — 30.

39A C.J.S., Health and Environment, §§ 74, 75.

Sec. 18.50.290.
Corrections and amendments.

A certificate or record registered by the bureau may be amended only in accordance with this chapter and the regulations the department adopts to protect the integrity and accuracy of vital statistics records.

A certificate that is amended under this section shall be marked “amended,” with the date of amendment. A summary description of the evidence submitted in support of the amendment shall be endorsed on or made a part of the record. The department shall prescribe by regulation the conditions under which additions or minor corrections may be made to vital statistics records without the certificate being considered amended.

Upon receipt of a certified copy of a court order changing the name of a person born in the state or a person born outside the United States whose adoptive parents are residents of the state at the time of the adoption and upon request of the person or the person’s parent, guardian, or legal representative, the state registrar shall amend the certificate of birth to reflect the new name.

When a certificate is corrected or amended under this section, the state registrar shall instruct the local custodian of the copy of the certificate to make the changes in the copy.

History.

(§ 25 ch 118 SLA 1960; am § 4 ch 76 SLA 1982)

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 7 AAC 5, art. 1.

For special procedures, see 7 AAC 5, art. 3.

Sec. 18.50.300.
Reproduction of records.

To preserve original documents the state registrar may prepare typewritten, photographic, or other reproductions of original records and files in the state registrar’s office.
When certified by the state registrar, the reproduction shall be accepted as the original record.

History.

(§ 26 ch 118 SLA 1960)

Sec. 18.50.310.
Disclosure of records.

To protect the integrity of vital statistics records, to ensure their proper use, and to ensure the efficient and proper administration of the vital statistics system, it is unlawful for a person to permit inspection of or to disclose information contained in vital statistics records, or to copy or issue a copy of all or part of a record, except as provided by this section or as authorized by regulations issued under this chapter. Regulations issued under this chapter may not authorize inspection, disclosure, or copying of all or part of any report or record received under AS

18.50.245

, except that the statistical report prepared under AS

18.50.245(d)

may be copied and distributed.

The bureau may permit the use of data contained in vital statistics records, other than reports of induced terminations of pregnancy, for research purposes.

Information in vital statistics records indicating that a birth occurred out of wedlock may not be disclosed except upon order of a superior court or as provided by regulations.

Appeals from decisions of the custodians of local records refusing disclosure under (a) and (b) of this section shall be made to the state registrar, whose decision is binding upon the custodian of local records.

The department may by regulation provide for the release of information, other than information in reports of induced terminations of pregnancy, to authorized representatives of organizations or foundations that counsel the next of kin of victims of sudden infant death syndrome.

Notwithstanding the provisions of AS

40.25.120

, when 100 years have elapsed after the date of a birth, or 50 years have elapsed after the date of a death, marriage, divorce, dissolution of marriage, or annulment, the records of these events in the custody of the state registrar become public records subject to inspection and copying as provided in AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.140

.

The principal health officer of a municipality, or a municipal health officer designated by the principal health officer, may inspect vital statistics records pertinent to the functions of the principal health officer. The state registrar may enter into an agreement with a municipality governing the conditions and purposes of those inspections.

Marriage license applications shall be open for public inspection or examination during normal business hours. The bureau may, in response to a request under AS

25.27.300

, disclose to the child support services agency whether the bureau has a record indicating that a person has remarried after the date specified by the agency.

In this section, “principal health officer” means the municipal official who is exercising health powers and who is primarily responsible for public health in the municipality.

History.

(§ 27 ch 118 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 132 SLA 1978; §§ 1, 2 ch 25 SLA 1984; am § 11 ch 200 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 79 SLA 1997; am § 10 ch 132 SLA 1998; am §§ 2 — 4 ch 141 SLA 2002)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (h) was enacted as (i). Relettered in 1997, at which time former subsection (h) was relettered as (i).

In 2000, in subsection (f), “AS

40.25.120

” was substituted for “AS 09.25.120” and “AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.140

” was substituted for “AS 09.25.110 —

09.25.140

” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of AS 09.25.110 —

09.25.140

.

In 2004, “child support enforcement agency” was changed to “child support services agency” in (h) of this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004.

Cross references. —

For inspection and copying of public records other than vital statistics records maintained under this chapter, see AS 40.25. For purpose and findings provisions related to the 1998 amendment to subsection (h), see § 1, ch. 132, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 7 AAC 5, art. 1.

For special procedures, see 7 AAC 5, art. 3.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The Bureau of Vital Statistics is authorized under its regulation, 7 AAC 05.925, to comply with requests for copies of documents made by the Longevity Bonus Program when necessary to perform its statutory duty of determining an individual’s eligibility to receive the longevity bonus, unless otherwise prohibited by federal law.
Feb. 4, 1981 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 18.50.315.
Records of missing children.

Upon receiving notification by the Department of Public Safety or another law enforcement agency that a child born in this state is missing, the bureau shall flag the birth certificate record of the missing child in a manner that alerts the bureau to the fact that the record is that of a missing child when a copy of that birth certificate or information regarding that birth certificate is requested. Upon notification by the department that the person who was listed as a missing child has been found, the bureau shall remove the flag from the person’s birth certificate record.

The bureau may not provide a copy of a birth certificate or information concerning the birth record of a person whose record is flagged under (a) of this section except as provided in this section.

When a copy of a flagged birth certificate is requested, the bureau shall immediately notify the Department of Public Safety. If a flagged record is requested in person, the bureau shall record the name, address, and telephone number of the person making the request. The bureau may only provide a copy of the requested birth certificate by mail.

In this section,

“child” means a person under 18 years of age;

“law enforcement agency” has the meaning given in AS

12.36.090

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 202 SLA 1990)

Sec. 18.50.320.
Copies of data from vital records.

Except as otherwise provided and in accordance with the regulations adopted under AS

18.50.310

,

the bureau and the custodian of permanent local records shall, upon request, issue a certified copy of a certificate or record in their custody, or a part of it; each copy issued must show the date of registration or recording, and copies issued from records marked “delayed,” “amended,” or “court order” shall be similarly marked and must show the effective date;

a certified copy of a certificate or a part of it issued in accordance with (1) of this section is considered the original for all purposes and is prima facie evidence of the facts stated; however, the evidentiary value of a certificate or record filed more than one year after the event, or a record that has been amended, or a presumptive death certificate, shall be determined by the judicial or administrative body or official before whom the certificate is offered as evidence;

the National Office of Vital Statistics may be furnished the copies or data it requires for national statistics if the bureau is reimbursed for the cost of furnishing the data; the National Office of Vital Statistics may not use the data for purposes other than statistical purposes unless authorized by the state registrar;

federal, state, local, and other public or private agencies, upon request, may be furnished copies or data for statistical purposes on the terms or conditions prescribed by the bureau;

a person or agency may not prepare or issue a certificate or part of a certificate that purports to be an original, certified copy, or copy of a certificate of birth, death, fetal death, or marriage, except as authorized in this chapter or the regulations adopted under it;

upon request, the bureau shall furnish a copy of a certificate or record registered by the bureau to the child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

, or the child support enforcement agency of another state, for child support purposes authorized under law; such a certificate or record that is prepared or maintained in an electronic data base may be supplied by providing the requesting agency with a copy of the electronic certificate or record and a statement certifying its contents;

the bureau shall issue up to four certified copies of the death certificate of a veteran without charge; under this paragraph, certified copies of a veteran’s death certificate are available without charge only to a qualified person; in this paragraph,

“qualified person” means an individual who is

a personal representative of the veteran’s estate;

a trustee of a revocable trust of which the veteran was the settlor; or

a person who needs a certified copy of the veteran’s death certificate for the purpose of satisfying an eligibility requirement for a benefit related to the death of the veteran;

“veteran” means an individual who was

on active duty at the time of the veteran’s death or had received an honorable or general discharge from a branch of the armed services of the United States, the National Guard, a reserve unit of the United States armed services, the Alaska Scouts, the Alaska Territorial Guard, or the Alaska Naval Militia; and

a resident of the state at the time of the individual’s death.

History.

(§ 28 ch 118 SLA 1960; am § 26 ch 87 SLA 1997; am § 1 ch 69 SLA 2012)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “child support enforcement agency created in AS

25.27.010

” was changed to “child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

” in this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004.

Cross references. —

For inspection and copying of public records other than vital statistics records, see AS

40.25.120

—

40.25.220

.

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 7 AAC 5, art. 1.

For special procedures, see 7 AAC 5, art. 3.

Sec. 18.50.330.
Fees for services.

The state registrar shall prescribe the fees to be paid for certified copies of certificates, for issuing marriage licenses, for searches of the files or records, for the filing of delayed or substitute certificates, for making amendments, for supplying documentary evidence for these purposes, and for special services rendered by the bureau.

[Repealed, § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991.]

History.

(§ 29 ch 118 SLA 1960; am § 35 ch 138 SLA 1986; am § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991; am § 2 ch 79 SLA 1997)

Administrative Code. —

For special procedures, see 7 AAC 5, art. 3.

Sec. 18.50.340.
Persons required to keep records.

A person in charge of an institution shall keep a record of personal particulars and data concerning each person admitted or confined to the institution. This record must include the information required by the certificates of birth, death, and fetal death issued under the provisions of this chapter, and other information required by the bureau. The record shall be made at the time of admission from information provided by the person, but when it cannot be obtained from the person it shall be obtained from relatives or other sources acquainted with the facts. The name and address of the person providing the information must be a part of the record.

When a dead human body or fetus is released or disposed of by an institution, the person in charge of the institution shall keep a record showing the name of the deceased, date of death, name and address of the person to whom the body is released, date of removal from the institution, or if finally disposed of by the institution, the date, place, and manner of disposition.

A funeral director, embalmer, or other person who removes from the place of death or transports or finally disposes of a dead body or fetus, in addition to filing a certificate or form required by this chapter, shall keep a record identifying the body, and the information pertaining to the receipt, removal, and delivery of the body required by the bureau.

Records maintained under this section shall be retained for a period of not less than five years and shall be made available for inspection by the state registrar or a representative of the state registrar upon demand.

History.

(§ 30 ch 118 SLA 1960)

Administrative Code. —

For special procedures, see 7 AAC 5, art. 3.

Sec. 18.50.350.
Duty to furnish information.

A person having knowledge of the facts shall furnish the information the person possesses regarding a birth, death, fetal death, induced termination of pregnancy, marriage, or divorce, upon demand of the state registrar.

History.

(§ 31 ch 118 SLA 1960; am § 5 ch 141 SLA 2002)

Secs. 18.50.360 — 18.50.380.
[Renumbered as AS 18.50.900 — 18.50.990.]